Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.040

Officers.

(1) The board shall annually appoint the officers of the state trust company, who serve at the pleasure of the board. The state trust company must have a principal executive officer primarily responsible for the execution of board policies and operation of the state trust company and an officer responsible for the maintenance and storage of all corporate books and records of the state trust company and for required attestation of signatures. These positions may not be held by the same person. The board may appoint other officers of the state trust company as the board considers necessary.

(2) Unless expressly authorized by a resolution of the board recorded in its minutes, an officer, manager, or employee may not create or dispose of a state trust company asset or create or incur a liability on behalf of the state trust company.

(3) Unless otherwise approved by the director, the chief executive officer, the president, the chief operating officer, or the chief financial officer of a state trust company, or an officer of the state trust company with an equivalent function, must be a Washington state resident.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the board of a state trust company shall designate officers and committees or subcommittees composed of such officers, consistent with the requirements of RCW 30B.24.030 and in conformity with the contents of the state trust company's written statement of principles of trust management, pursuant to RCW 30B.24.040, as adopted by the board and subject to approval of the department.

[ 2019 c 389 s 35; 2014 c 37 s 350.]